src/assets/uz-lat.aff
SFX X g gmaganlarigamikan g
SFX X g gmaganlariga-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlaridan g
SFX X g gmaganlaridanmi g
SFX X g gmaganlaridandir g
SFX X g gmaganlaridan-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaridandir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaridanmikan g
SFX X g gmaganlaridan-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlarida g
SFX X g gmaganlaridami g
SFX X g gmaganlaridadir g
SFX X g gmaganlarida-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaridadir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaridamikan g
SFX X g gmaganlarida-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizni g
SFX X g gmaganlarimiznimi g
SFX X g gmaganlarimiznidir g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizni-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimiznidir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimiznimikan g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizni-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizning g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizningmi g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizningdir g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizning-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizningdir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizningmikan g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizning-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizga g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizgami g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizgadir g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizga-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizgadir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizgamikan g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizga-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdan g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdanmi g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdandir g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdan-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdandir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdanmikan g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdan-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizda g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdami g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdadir g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizda-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdadir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizdamikan g
SFX X g gmaganlarimizda-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizni g
SFX X g gmaganlaringiznimi g
SFX X g gmaganlaringiznidir g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizni-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringiznidir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringiznimikan g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizni-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizning g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizningmi g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizningdir g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizning-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizningdir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizningmikan g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizning-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizga g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizgami g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizgadir g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizga-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizgadir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizgamikan g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizga-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdan g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdanmi g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdandir g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdan-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdandir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdanmikan g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdan-ku g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizda g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdami g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdadir g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizda-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdadir-da g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizdamikan g
SFX X g gmaganlaringizda-ku g
SFX X 0 qanningmi q
SFX X 0 qanningdir q
SFX X 0 qanning-da q
SFX X 0 qanningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qanningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanning-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimni q
SFX X 0 qanimnimi q
SFX X 0 qanimnidir q
SFX X 0 qanimni-da q
SFX X 0 qanimnidir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimnimikan q
SFX X 0 qanimni-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimning q
SFX X 0 qanimningmi q
SFX X 0 qanimningdir q
SFX X 0 qanimning-da q
SFX X 0 qanimningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanimning-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimga q
SFX X 0 qanimgami q
SFX X 0 qanimgadir q
SFX X 0 qanimga-da q
SFX X 0 qanimgadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimgamikan q
SFX X 0 qanimga-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimdan q
SFX X 0 qanimdanmi q
SFX X 0 qanimdandir q
SFX X 0 qanimdan-da q
SFX X 0 qanimdandir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimdanmikan q
SFX X 0 qanimdan-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimda q
SFX X 0 qanimdami q
SFX X 0 qanimdadir q
SFX X 0 qanimda-da q
SFX X 0 qanimdadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimdamikan q
SFX X 0 qanimda-ku q
SFX X 0 qanini q
SFX X 0 qaninimi q
SFX X 0 qaninidir q
SFX X 0 qanini-da q
SFX X 0 qaninidir-da q
SFX X 0 qaninimikan q
SFX X 0 qanini-ku q
SFX X 0 qanining q
SFX X 0 qaniningmi q
SFX X 0 qaniningdir q
SFX X 0 qanining-da q
SFX X 0 qaniningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qaniningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanining-ku q
SFX X 0 qaniga q
SFX X 0 qanigami q
SFX X 0 qanigadir q
SFX X 0 qaniga-da q
SFX X 0 qanigadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanigamikan q
SFX X 0 qaniga-ku q
SFX X 0 qanidan q
SFX X 0 qanidanmi q
SFX X 0 qanidandir q
SFX X 0 qanidan-da q
SFX X 0 qanidandir-da q
SFX X 0 qanidanmikan q
SFX X 0 qanidan-ku q
SFX X 0 qanida q
SFX X 0 qanidami q
SFX X 0 qanidadir q
SFX X 0 qanida-da q
SFX X 0 qanidadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanidamikan q
SFX X 0 qanida-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimiznimi q
SFX X 0 qanimiznidir q
SFX X 0 qanimizni-da q
SFX X 0 qanimiznidir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimiznimikan q
SFX X 0 qanimizni-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimizning q
SFX X 0 qanimizningmi q
SFX X 0 qanimizningdir q
SFX X 0 qanimizning-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanimizning-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimizga q
SFX X 0 qanimizgami q
SFX X 0 qanimizgadir q
SFX X 0 qanimizga-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizgadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizgamikan q
SFX X 0 qanimizga-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimizdan q
SFX X 0 qanimizdanmi q
SFX X 0 qanimizdandir q
SFX X 0 qanimizdan-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizdandir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizdanmikan q
SFX X 0 qanimizdan-ku q
SFX X 0 qanimizda q
SFX X 0 qanimizdami q
SFX X 0 qanimizdadir q
SFX X 0 qanimizda-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizdadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanimizdamikan q
SFX X 0 qanimizda-ku q
SFX X 0 qaningizni q
SFX X 0 qaningiznimi q
SFX X 0 qaningiznidir q
SFX X 0 qaningizni-da q
SFX X 0 qaningiznidir-da q
SFX X 0 qaningiznimikan q
SFX X 0 qaningizni-ku q
SFX X 0 qaningizning q
SFX X 0 qaningizningmi q
SFX X 0 qaningizningdir q
SFX X 0 qaningizning-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizningmikan q
SFX X 0 qaningizning-ku q
SFX X 0 qaningizga q
SFX X 0 qaningizgami q
SFX X 0 qaningizgadir q
SFX X 0 qaningizga-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizgadir-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizgamikan q
SFX X 0 qaningizga-ku q
SFX X 0 qaningizdan q
SFX X 0 qaningizdanmi q
SFX X 0 qaningizdandir q
SFX X 0 qaningizdan-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizdandir-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizdanmikan q
SFX X 0 qaningizdan-ku q
SFX X 0 qaningizda q
SFX X 0 qaningizdami q
SFX X 0 qaningizdadir q
SFX X 0 qaningizda-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizdadir-da q
SFX X 0 qaningizdamikan q
SFX X 0 qaningizda-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarningmi q
SFX X 0 qanlarningdir q
SFX X 0 qanlarning-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarning-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimni q
SFX X 0 qanlarimnimi q
SFX X 0 qanlarimnidir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimni-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimnidir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimnimikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimni-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimning q
SFX X 0 qanlarimningmi q
SFX X 0 qanlarimningdir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimning-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimning-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimga q
SFX X 0 qanlarimgami q
SFX X 0 qanlarimgadir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimga-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimgadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimgamikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimga-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdanmi q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdandir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdan-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdandir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdanmikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdan-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimda q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdami q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdadir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimda-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimdamikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimda-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarini q
SFX X 0 qanlarinimi q
SFX X 0 qanlarinidir q
SFX X 0 qanlarini-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarinidir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarinimikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarini-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarining q
SFX X 0 qanlariningmi q
SFX X 0 qanlariningdir q
SFX X 0 qanlarining-da q
SFX X 0 qanlariningdir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlariningmikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarining-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlariga q
SFX X 0 qanlarigami q
SFX X 0 qanlarigadir q
SFX X 0 qanlariga-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarigadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarigamikan q
SFX X 0 qanlariga-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlaridan q
SFX X 0 qanlaridanmi q
SFX X 0 qanlaridandir q
SFX X 0 qanlaridan-da q
SFX X 0 qanlaridandir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlaridanmikan q
SFX X 0 qanlaridan-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarida q
SFX X 0 qanlaridami q
SFX X 0 qanlaridadir q
SFX X 0 qanlarida-da q
SFX X 0 qanlaridadir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlaridamikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarida-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizni q
SFX X 0 qanlarimiznimi q
SFX X 0 qanlarimiznidir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizni-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimiznidir-da q
SFX X 0 qanlarimiznimikan q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizni-ku q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizning q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizningmi q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizningdir q
SFX X 0 qanlarimizning-da q
